Louisiana, session 2026, HB582.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 32:863(A)(3)(a) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§863. Sanctions for false declaration; reinstatement fees; revocation of registration;
review
A.
* * *
(3)(a) Sanctions for a violation of Paragraph (1) of this Subsection shall be
imposed until proof of required liability security is provided to the secretary and all
reinstatement fees are paid. Sanctions for a violation of Paragraph (2) of this
Subsection shall be imposed for a period of not less than twelve months nor more
than eighteen months. However, in no event shall these sanctions be removed until
such time as proof of the required security is provided to the secretary along with all
appropriate fees required by law, including a reinstatement fee of one hundred
dollars per violation of Paragraph (1) of this Subsection if the vehicle was not
covered by the required security for a period of one to thirty days, two hundred fifty
dollars if the vehicle was not covered by required security for a period of thirty-one
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-746 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 582
to ninety days, and five hundred dollars if the vehicle was not covered by required
security for a period in excess of ninety days. No reinstatement fee shall be imposed
by the secretary if the vehicle was not covered by required security for a period of
ten fifteen days or less and the insured surrenders the vehicle's license plate to the
secretary within ten fifteen days or if the violation is the insured's first violation
pursuant to Paragraph (1) of this Subsection and the lapse of insurance coverage was
for ten fifteen days or less, provided that immediate notice of the cancellation is
given within one to five days before issuing the violation. A reinstatement fee of
fifty dollars shall be imposed if the vehicle was not covered by the required security
for a period of sixteen to thirty days provided the violation is the insured's first
violation pursuant to Paragraph (1) of this Subsection and immediate notice of the
cancellation is given within one to five days before issuing the violation. In addition,
notice shall be transmitted to the insured through any digitized credentials
established pursuant to R.S. 39:17.2(D) within one to five days before issuing the
violation. The reinstatement fees for violations of Paragraph (2) of this Subsection
shall be as follows: two hundred fifty dollars for a first violation, five hundred
dollars for a second violation, and one thousand dollars for a third or subsequent
violation. The reinstatement fee shall not be owed for an alleged violation of
Paragraph (2) of this Subsection when proof of the required security is provided to
the secretary within sixty days of the date of the notice. If at the time of
reinstatement, a person has multiple violations and is within sixty days of the notice,
the total amount of fees to be paid shall not exceed eight hundred fifty dollars for
violations of Paragraph (1) of this Subsection and one thousand seventy-five dollars
for violations of Paragraph (2) of this Subsection. At no time shall the total amount
of fees, including administrative fees, exceed two hundred fifty dollars for persons
sixty-five years or older. After sixty days of the date of the notice, all fees shall be
considered final delinquent debt and therefore owed, and the eight-hundred-fifty-
dollar limit for persons under sixty-five years shall no longer apply.
* * *
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-746 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 582